Idaho, session 2025, H0036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 52, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-5251A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-5251A. SUBPOENAS. (1) Upon request by a party in a contested case or
on a presiding officer's own initiative, the presiding officer, on a showing
of general relevance and reasonable scope of the evidence sought for use at
the hearing, may issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness and the pro-
duction of books, records, and other evidence.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by law or agency rule, a subpoena issued
pursuant to this section shall be served in the manner provided by law for the
service of a subpoena in a civil action.
(3) Witness fees shall be paid by the party requesting a subpoena pur-
suant to this section in the manner provided by law for witness fees in a
civil action.
(4) Any subpoena issued pursuant to this section may be enforced by the
district courts of this state within the jurisdiction in which the inquiry
is being conducted or within the jurisdiction in which the person to whom the
subpoena was issued resides or conducts his business. The court shall have
jurisdiction to hear the parties, determine the reasonableness of the sub-
poena, and set aside, modify, or enforce the subpoena by its order in accor-
dance with the evidence. Any failure to obey such court order may be punished
by the court as a contempt of the order.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.